Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6266.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 61. (1) An electric provider shall offer to its customers the opportunity to participate in a voluntary green pricing program under which the customer may specify, from the options made available by the electric provider, the amount of electricity attributable to the customer that will be renewable energy. If the electric provider's rates are regulated by the commission, the voluntary green pricing program, including the rates paid for renewable energy, must be approved by the commission and is subject to the requirements of subsection (2). The customer is responsible for any additional costs incurred and shall accrue any additional savings realized by the electric provider as a result of the customer's participation in the program. If an electric provider has not yet fully recovered the incremental costs of compliance, both of the following apply: (a) A customer that receives at least 50% of the customer's average monthly electricity consumption through the voluntary green pricing program is exempt from paying surcharges for incremental costs of compliance. (b) Before entering into an agreement to participate in a commission-approved voluntary green pricing program with a customer that will not receive at least 50% of the customer's average monthly electricity consumption through the program, the electric provider shall notify the customer that the customer will be responsible for the full applicable charges for the incremental costs of compliance and for participation in the voluntary renewable energy program as provided under this section. (2) An electric provider whose rates are regulated by the commission shall establish a clean technologies accelerator tariff for commercial and industrial customers that participate in the voluntary green pricing program, to enable the commercial and industrial customers to support the procurement of clean energy resources. Only commercial and industrial customers that participate in the voluntary green pricing program are responsible for the clean technologies accelerator tariff. An electric provider whose rates are regulated by the commission shall enter into an agreement with any commercial or industrial customer that participates in the voluntary green pricing program that states the cost recovery from that commercial or industrial customer for the renewable energy resources and the appropriate credit to the commercial or industrial customer's bill for the value to the electric provider's system of the energy, capacity, and environmental attributes provided by the renewable energy resources. The commission shall approve the clean technologies accelerator tariff established under this subsection. (3) An electric provider shall not recover through rates any costs associated with participation in the voluntary green pricing program under this section. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 6135. (b) House Bill No. 6136. (c) House Bill No. 6137. (d) House Bill No. 6138. (e) House Bill No. 6139. (f) House Bill No. 6140. (g) House Bill No. 6141. (h) House Bill No. 6142.